src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in UNDEFINED language are numbers.

LEXICON Numerals

kaheksan	cardinal ;
kaksi	cardinal ;
kolme	cardinal ;
kolmi	cardinal ;
kolmoisen	cardinal_vaill ;
kuusi	cardinal ;
kymmen(en)	cardinal ;
kymmeniene	cardinal ;
kymmenine	cardinal ;
miljana	cardinal ;
miljon	cardinal ;
nelji	cardinal ;
neljä	cardinal ;
puoli	cardinal ;
sata	cardinal ;
satattšu	cardinal ;
seittšemen	cardinal ;
tuha	cardinal ;
tuhannus	cardinal ;
tuhat	cardinal ;
tuhatta	cardinal ;
viisi	cardinal ;
yheksän	cardinal ;
eisimäine	ordinal ;
ensimäine	ordinal ;
jesoatoi	ordinal ;
kaheksas	ordinal ;
kahes	ordinal ;
kolmas	ordinal ;
kuuves	ordinal ;
kymmenes	ordinal ;
neljäs	ordinal ;
seittšemes	ordinal ;
semnatsatoi	ordinal ;
šes(t)natsatoi	ordinal ;
šestoi	ordinal ;
setmoi	ordinal ;
tšetvertoi	ordinal ;
tuhannes	ordinal ;
viijes	ordinal ;
vośmoi	ordinal ;
yheksäs	ordinal ;

LEXICON cardinal
+Num: # ;

LEXICON cardinal_vaill
+Num: # ;

LEXICON ordinal
+A+Ord # ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
